Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.46.100

Rules.

The director is empowered to adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules as may be necessary for the implementation of this chapter and its purposes.

[ 1994 c 92 s 141; 1975 1st ex.s. c 87 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.46.100.]